test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_kieras_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kierâš: # MLO, ok 
    kierâš+N+Sg+Nom: kierâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Gen: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Acc: kierrâš
    kierâš+N+Sg+Ill: kieˊrâččân
    kierâš+N+Sg+Loc: kieˊrâččist
    kierâš+N+Sg+Com: kieˊrâččáin
    kierâš+N+Sg+Abe: kierrâšttáá
    kierâš+N+Ess: kieˊrâččin
    kierâš+N+Par: kieˊrâččid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Nom: kieˊrâččeh
    kierâš+N+Pl+Gen: kieˊrâččij
    kierâš+N+Pl+Acc: kieˊrâččijd
    kierâš+N+Pl+Ill: kieˊrâččáid
    kierâš+N+Pl+Loc: kieˊrâččijn
    kierâš+N+Pl+Com: kieˊrâččijguin
    kierâš+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊrâččijttáá

  Noun - vuorâš: # MLO, ok 
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuorâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuorrâš
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Ill: vuoˊrâččân
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Loc: vuoˊrâččist
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Com: vuoˊrâččáin
    vuorâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuorrâšttáá
    vuorâš+N+Ess: vuoˊrâččin
    vuorâš+N+Par: vuoˊrâččid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Nom: vuoˊrâččeh
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Gen: vuoˊrâččij
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Acc: vuoˊrâččijd
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Ill: vuoˊrâččáid
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Loc: vuoˊrâččijn
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊrâččijguin
    vuorâš+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊrâččijttáá
